Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-9002
Purposes of act; applicability.

(1) The purposes
of the Risk Management and Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Act are to provide
requirements for maintaining a risk management framework and completing an
own risk and solvency assessment and to provide guidance and instructions
for filing an own risk and solvency assessment summary report with the director.

(2) The requirements
of the act apply to all insurers domiciled in this state unless exempt pursuant
to section 44-9008.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 2.
January 1, 2015